finnish.large.aff
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETÄÄNKÖ
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETÄÄNKÄÄN
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETÄÄNHÄN
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETÄÄNPÄ
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETÄÄNKÖHÄN
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTIIN
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄISIIN
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄESSÄ
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVÄ
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVÄÄ
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVÄN
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVÄSSÄ
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVÄSTÄ
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVÄÄN
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVÄLLÄ
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVÄLTÄ
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVÄLLE
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVÄNÄ
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVÄKSI
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVÄT
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVIÄ
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVIEN
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVISSÄ
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVISTÄ
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVIIN
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVILLÄ
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVILTÄ
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVILLE
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVINÄ
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVIKSI
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVIN
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTIINKIN
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTIINKÖ
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTIINKÄÄN
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTIINHÄN
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTIINPÄ
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTIINKÖHÄN
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄISIINKIN
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄISIINKÖ
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄISIINKÄÄN
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄISIINHÄN
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄISIINPÄ
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄISIINKÖHÄN
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄESSÄKIN
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄESSÄKÖ
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄESSÄKÄÄN
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄESSÄHÄN
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄESSÄPÄ
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄESSÄKÖHÄN
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVÄKIN
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVÄKÖ
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVÄKÄÄN
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVÄHÄN
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVÄPÄ
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVÄKÖHÄN
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVÄÄKIN
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVÄÄKÖ
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVÄÄKÄÄN
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVÄÄHÄN
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVÄÄPÄ
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVÄÄKÖHÄN
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVÄNKIN
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVÄNKÖ
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVÄNKÄÄN
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVÄNHÄN
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVÄNPÄ
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVÄNKÖHÄN
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVÄSSÄKIN
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVÄSSÄKÖ
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVÄSSÄKÄÄN
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVÄSSÄHÄN
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVÄSSÄPÄ
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVÄSSÄKÖHÄN
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVÄSTÄKIN
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVÄSTÄKÖ
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVÄSTÄKÄÄN
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVÄSTÄHÄN
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVÄSTÄPÄ
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVÄSTÄKÖHÄN
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVÄÄNKIN
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVÄÄNKÖ
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVÄÄNKÄÄN
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVÄÄNHÄN
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVÄÄNPÄ
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVÄÄNKÖHÄN
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVÄLLÄKIN
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVÄLLÄKÖ
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVÄLLÄKÄÄN
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVÄLLÄHÄN
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVÄLLÄPÄ
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVÄLLÄKÖHÄN
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVÄLTÄKIN
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVÄLTÄKÖ
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVÄLTÄKÄÄN
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVÄLTÄHÄN
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVÄLTÄPÄ
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVÄLTÄKÖHÄN
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVÄLLEKIN
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVÄLLEKÖ
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVÄLLEKÄÄN
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVÄLLEHÄN
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVÄLLEPÄ
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVÄLLEKÖHÄN
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVÄNÄKIN
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVÄNÄKÖ
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVÄNÄKÄÄN
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVÄNÄHÄN
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVÄNÄPÄ
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVÄNÄKÖHÄN
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVÄKSIKIN
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVÄKSIKÖ
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVÄKSIKÄÄN
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVÄKSIHÄN
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVÄKSIPÄ
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVÄKSIKÖHÄN
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVÄTKIN
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVÄTKÖ
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVÄTKÄÄN
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVÄTHÄN
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVÄTPÄ
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVÄTKÖHÄN
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVIÄKIN
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVIÄKÖ
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVIÄKÄÄN
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVIÄHÄN
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVIÄPÄ
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVIÄKÖHÄN
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVIENKIN
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVIENKÖ
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVIENKÄÄN
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVIENHÄN
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVIENPÄ
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVIENKÖHÄN
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVISSÄKIN
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVISSÄKÖ
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVISSÄKÄÄN
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVISSÄHÄN
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVISSÄPÄ
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVISSÄKÖHÄN
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVISTÄKIN
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVISTÄKÖ
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVISTÄKÄÄN
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVISTÄHÄN
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVISTÄPÄ
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVISTÄKÖHÄN
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVIINKIN
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVIINKÖ
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVIINKÄÄN
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVIINHÄN
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVIINPÄ
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVIINKÖHÄN
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVILLÄKIN
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVILLÄKÖ
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVILLÄKÄÄN
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVILLÄHÄN
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVILLÄPÄ
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVILLÄKÖHÄN
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVILTÄKIN
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVILTÄKÖ
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVILTÄKÄÄN
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVILTÄHÄN
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVILTÄPÄ
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVILTÄKÖHÄN
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVILLEKIN
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVILLEKÖ
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVILLEKÄÄN
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVILLEHÄN
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVILLEPÄ
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVILLEKÖHÄN
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVINÄKIN
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVINÄKÖ
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVINÄKÄÄN
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVINÄHÄN
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVINÄPÄ
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVINÄKÖHÄN
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVIKSIKIN
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVIKSIKÖ
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVIKSIKÄÄN
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVIKSIHÄN
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVIKSIPÄ
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVIKSIKÖHÄN
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVINKIN
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVINKÖ
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVINKÄÄN
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVINHÄN
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVINPÄ
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVINKÖHÄN
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄISI
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTY
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄISIKÄÄN
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTYKÄÄN
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄMÄN
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄKÖÖN
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄKÖ
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄNEEN
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄNE
   [^ÄEIÖY] Ä N >	-ÄN,ETTÄVINE
